North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-09.1 Inspections and Grading of Agricultural Commodities [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11]

4-09.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09.1-02.
Commissioner — Duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09.1-03.
Grade inspection — Fees and charges. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09.1-04.
Cooperation with departments and bureaus. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09.1-05.
Seed commission may receive and expend funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.

4-09.1-06.
Administrative procedure and judicial review. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 11.